Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1,126
Board of Pardons; created; members; secretary.

There is hereby created the Board of Pardons which shall consist of the Governor, Attorney General, and Secretary of State. The Governor shall be chairperson of the board. The Secretary of State shall be secretary of the board and keep its records or designate such a record keeper.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 57, p. 3102;

Laws 1994, LB 677, § 11.

Communications to the Board of Pardons are protected by absolute privilege. Kocontes v. McQuaid, 279 Neb. 335, 778 N.W.2d 410 (2010).